Louisiana, session 2026, HB259.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1749.28 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1749.28. BEAD excavations; requirements for repair
A. For the purpose of this Section, "BEAD Program" means the Broadband
Equity, Access, and Deployment Program administered by the National
Telecommunications and Information administration of the United States
Department of Commerce.
B. Notwithstanding the notice requirements outlined in R.S. 40:1749.13, an
excavator or demolisher who is excavating or demolishing utilizing funding provided
by the BEAD Program shall be required to give notice at least one calendar week in
advance of the commencement of any excavation or demolition activity.
C.(1) Prior to the commencement of any excavation or demolition activity
utilizing funding provided by the BEAD Program, the excavator or demolisher who
is excavating or demolishing utilizing funding provided by the BEAD Program shall
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-537 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 259
conduct pre-construction coordination with all known operators of underground
utilities or facilities within the proposed project area.
(2) Coordination shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(a) Verification of the location of underground facilities through available
records and field markings.
(b) Identification of potential conflicts between proposed excavation and
existing facilities.
(c) Communication of construction methods, timelines, and areas of planned
excavation.
(3) Operators of underground utilities or facilities shall cooperate in good
faith in such coordination and provide available information regarding the location
of their facilities.
(4) The office of broadband development and connectivity may establish
rules or guidance to implement the provisions of this Subsection.
(5) The excavator or demolisher who is excavating or demolishing utilizing
funding provided by the BEAD Program shall maintain documentation of such
coordination and make the documentation available to the office of broadband
development and connectivity upon request.
D.(1) Each excavator or demolisher who is excavating or demolishing
utilizing funding provided by the BEAD Program performing work utilizing funding
provided by the BEAD Program shall designate a primary point of contact
responsible for coordination and communication regarding construction activities
within each parish or municipality in which work is performed.
(2) The designated point of contact shall do both of the following:
(a) Be available during normal business hours and reasonably available
during active construction operations.
(b) Be authorized to respond to issues related to underground utility
conflicts, damages, and coordination with local officials.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-537 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 259
(3) The name and contact information of the designated point of contact shall
be provided prior to the commencement of construction to all of the following:
(a) The governing authority of each affected parish or municipality.
(b) The office of broadband development and connectivity.
(4) The excavator or demolisher who is excavating or demolishing utilizing
funding provided by the BEAD Program shall update the contact information as
necessary to ensure accuracy throughout the duration of the project.
(5) The designated point of contact shall be capable of responding to
emergency situations within a reasonable timeframe, including coordination of
immediate corrective actions in the event of damage to underground utilities.
E. An excavator or demolisher who is excavating or demolishing utilizing
funding provided by the BEAD Program that damages an underground utility or
facility shall be responsible for all of the following:
(1) Providing immediate measures to prevent further damage and to stop any
leakage.
(2) Notifying the relevant parties pursuant to this Chapter immediately.
(3) Repairing the damage or paying the cost to repair the damage, if the
excavator or demolisher who is excavating or demolishing utilizing funding provided
by the BEAD Program is determined to be at fault for such damage in accordance
with the provisions of this Chapter.
F.(1) For purposes of this Section, fault shall be determined based on
compliance with all applicable notice, marking, and excavation requirements set
forth in this Chapter, including but not limited to the accuracy of utility location
markings and adherence to safe digging practices.
(2) An excavator or demolisher who is excavating or demolishing utilizing
funding provided by the BEAD Program shall not be considered at fault where
damage results from inaccurate, incomplete, or untimely facility location markings
provided by an operator.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-537 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 259
G. An excavator or demolisher who is excavating or demolishing utilizing
funding provided by the BEAD Program who is in violation of Subsection C of this
Section shall not receive its final reimbursement from the office of broadband
development and connectivity pursuant to R.S. 51:2370.32 until it is in compliance
with Subsection C of this Section.
H. Except as outlined in this Section, excavators or demolishers who are
excavating or demolishing utilizing funding provided by the BEAD Program shall
be subject to the provisions of this Chapter.